test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-3lex_cokkiittid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Verb - pappaattiđ: # MLO, checked; check also Imprt, ConNeg -forms and Ill
    pappaattiđ+V+Inf: pappaattiđ
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pappaattâm
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pappaattah
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pappat
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pappaatteen
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: pappatvettee
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: pappaattává
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pappaattep
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pappatvetteđ
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pappaatteh
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pappaattim
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pappaattih
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pappaattij
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [pappaattáim, pappaattááim]
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [pappaattáid, pappaattááid]
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [pappaattáin, pappaattááin]
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pappaattijm
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pappaattijd
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pappaattii
    pappaattiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: pappaattiččim
    pappaattiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: pappaattiččih
    pappaattiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: pappaattičij
    pappaattiđ+V+Cond+Du1: [pappaattiččijm, pappaattiččiijm]
    pappaattiđ+V+Cond+Du2: [pappaattiččijd, pappaattiččiijd]
    pappaattiđ+V+Cond+Du3: [pappaattiččijn, pappaattiččiijn]
    pappaattiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: pappaattiččijm
    pappaattiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: pappaattiččijd
    pappaattiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: pappaattiččii
    pappaattiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: pappaattižžeem
    pappaattiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: pappaattižžeeh
    pappaattiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: pappaattiš
    pappaattiđ+V+Pot+Du1: pappaattižžeen
    pappaattiđ+V+Pot+Du2: pappaattišvettee
    pappaattiđ+V+Pot+Du3: pappaattižává
    pappaattiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: pappaattižžep
    pappaattiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: pappaattišvetteđ
    pappaattiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: pappaattižeh
    pappaattiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: pappaattum
    pappaattiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: pappat
    pappaattiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: pappaattus
    pappaattiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: pappaattoon
    pappaattiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: pappaattee
    pappaattiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: pappaattus
    pappaattiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: pappaattop
    pappaattiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: pappaattiđ
    pappaattiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: pappaattus
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: pappat
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: pappaattâm
    pappaattiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: pappaattiččii
    pappaattiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: pappaattižžii
    pappaattiđ+V+PrsPrc: [pappaatteijee, pappaattijjee]
    pappaattiđ+V+PrfPrc: pappaattâm
    pappaattiđ+V+Actio: pappaattem
    pappaattiđ+V+Actio+Ess: pappatmin
    pappaattiđ+V+Actio+Loc: pappatmist
    pappaattiđ+V+Actio+Ill: pappatmân
    pappaattiđ+V+Actio+Com: pappatdijn
    pappaattiđ+V+VAbess: pappathánnáá
